California, session 20252026, AB1057.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17140.6 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17140.6. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2030, gross income does not include qualified overtime wages received by a qualified taxpayer.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Qualified overtime wages” means overtime wages paid to a qualified taxpayer in relation to work performed directly in response to, or in support of, emergency operations in an area impacted by a duly declared state of emergency or local emergency.(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means a either of the following:(A) A first responder, as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 8562 of the Government Code, that is officially deployed in response to, or in support of, emergency operations relating to a duly declared state of emergency or local emergency.(B) An emergency medical technician, paramedic, or ambulance driver employed by an entity that is contractually responsible for emergency ambulance services for a fire agency pursuant to Section 1797.230 of the Health and Safety Code, and is officially deployed in response to, or in support of, emergency operations relating to a duly declared state of emergency or local emergency.(3) “State of emergency” and “local emergency” shall have the same meanings as those terms are defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code.(c) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section. (2) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any regulations regarding verification procedures, documentation requirements, and any other reporting requirements. (d) This section shall only remain operative until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. For the purpose of complying with Section 41 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as it relates to the exclusion provided by Section 17140.6 of that code, the Legislature finds and declares both of the following: (a) The specific goal of the exclusions is to address the extraordinary circumstances faced by first responders during major disasters, providing financial recognition of their critical service during times of extreme public need. (b) There is no available data to collect or report with respect to the exclusion added by Section 17140.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. SEC. 3. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.